California statutes. Elections Code
(a) The name of that national party with which the Peace and Freedom Party is presently affiliated and the address and telephone number of the principal office of that national party.

(b) The number of delegates to represent the Peace and Freedom Party of California in the next
 national convention of that national party.

(c) The number of delegate candidates to be selected from each territory pursuant to Sections 6744 and 6745 by each committee proposing a group of national convention delegates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 913, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

6744.

For the purposes of this chapter, the boundary between the northern and southern territories of the state shall be that latitudinal line coinciding with the northern boundaries of San Luis Obispo, Kern, and San Bernardino Counties.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6745.

The number of delegate candidates to be selected from each territory by each group shall be, to the nearest whole number, proportional to that portion of the state’s registered Peace and Freedom Party voters residing in each territory as reflected in statements of voters and political affiliation transmitted to the Secretary of State on the 135th day before the presidential primary election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Qualification of Group of Candidates for National Convention Delegate Portion of Primary Ballot [6760. - 6769.]

6760.

Any five or more voters of the state who are registered as affiliated with the Peace and Freedom Party may join as a committee in proposing the nomination of a group of candidates for delegates. The committee may elect its officers, select the candidates for delegates, select the chairperson of the committee, secure the endorsement of the person, if any, preferred by the committee as candidate for presidential nominee, appoint alternates, assemble and file all necessary papers, and take all other action that may be necessary for the organization and election of
 the group. The committee in performing its functions may act through its officers or designated representatives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 790, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6761.

The committee, on or before the 104th day before the presidential primary election, shall file with the Secretary of State a statement containing the name of the committee and the names, residence addresses and telephone numbers of at least five of its members, and its officers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6762.

The number of candidates for delegate grouped on a nomination paper shall be equal to the total number of delegates to be elected by the Peace and Freedom Party.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6763.

The names of the grouped candidates shall be so selected that the portion of the candidates for national convention delegates residing in the northern and southern territories shall be proportional, to the nearest whole number, to the portion of the state’s Peace and Freedom Party registered voters residing in each territory as computed and certified by the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 6743. If the names are not so selected, the names shall not be certified by the Secretary of State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6764.

The number of alternates to be selected shall be no greater than one for each delegate, and the alternates shall be selected in the manner prescribed by Section 6763.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6765.

Each group of candidates for delegate that intends to pledge itself to the candidacy of a particular candidate for presidential nominee shall have the endorsement of the candidate for presidential nominee for whom the members of the group have filed a preference. The endorsement of the candidate for presidential nominee shall be filed with the Secretary of State before the circulation of any nomination papers of a group of candidates pledged to the support of her or his candidacy as presidential nominee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6766.

Any candidate for delegate whose nomination paper is filed in more than one group is disqualified from running as a member of any group.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6767.

Each candidate for Peace and Freedom Party delegate to the national convention shall file with the Secretary of State, before the circulation of nomination papers of the group of candidates of which she or he is a member, a declaration which shall state all of the following:

(a) Her or his residence, with street and number, if any.

(b) That she or he is a voter registered as affiliated with the Peace and Freedom Party at her or his
 residence address.

(c) That she or he is a candidate for office of delegate.

(d) That she or he will not withdraw as a candidate before the presidential primary.

(e) That she or he will qualify as a delegate if elected.

(f) In the case of a candidate for delegate on a slate of delegates pledging itself to the candidacy of a particular candidate for presidential nominee, the following statement: “I personally prefer ____ as the nominee of the Peace and Freedom Party for President of the United States, and hereby declare to the voters of the Peace and Freedom Party in the State of California that if elected as delegate to the national convention, I shall to the best of my judgment and ability, support ____ as the nominee of the Peace and Freedom Party for
 President of the United States.”

(g) In the case of a candidate for delegate on a slate of delegates not expressing a preference for a particular presidential candidate the following statement: “I express no preference for a particular presidential candidate. The chairperson of my group is ____.”

The name of a candidate for presidential nominee shall not be placed on the ballot unless this declaration has been properly filed by each candidate for delegate of the group supporting the candidate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6768.

The declaration of a candidate for delegate shall be in substantially the following form: Declaration of Candidate for DelegateState of CaliforniaCounty of ⎱
 ⎰ss.I, ______,
 reside and am a registered voter at(street address) ,in the (city or town) of ,in the County of _______, State of California.I desire to be a candidate, at the presidential primary to be held on 
the ____ day of ____, 20_, for delegate to the next national 
convention of the ____ Party with which the Peace and Freedom 
Party of California is affiliated on the national level and I will qualify 
as a delegate if elected.I personally prefer ____ as the nominee of the Peace and 
Freedom Party for President of the United States, and hereby declare 
to the voters of the Peace and Freedom Party in the State of 
California that if elected as delegate to the national party convention, 
I shall to the best of my judgment and ability, support ____ as the 
nominee of the Peace and Freedom Party for President of the United 
States. (This statement of preference shall be omitted where the 
candidate for delegate is part of a group not expressing a preference 
for a particular presidential candidate.)I declare under penalty of perjury that the foregoing is true and 
correct.
Executed at ______, California, this ____ day of ____, 
 20_.(Signed)

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 103.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

6769.

Nomination papers for candidates for delegates shall be signed by voters registered as affiliated with the Peace and Freedom Party equal in number to not less than 1 percent of the number of persons registered as members of the Peace and Freedom Party, as reflected in the reports of registration transmitted to the Secretary of State on the 135th day before the presidential primary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Preparation, Circulation and Filing of Nominating Papers [6780. - 6798.]

6780.

This article applies to the nomination of a candidate for the presidential preference portion of the primary ballot, to the nomination of a slate of delegates pledged to the candidacy of a particular candidate, and to the nomination of a slate of delegates not expressing a preference for a particular candidate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6781.

Nomination papers properly prepared, circulated, signed, and verified shall be left for examination with the elections official of the county in which they are circulated at least 81 days prior to the presidential primary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 111.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

6782.

Each signer of a nomination paper for the presidential primary ballot may sign only one paper. The signer shall add her or his printed name and place of residence indicating city and giving the street and number, if any.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6783.

Any nomination paper may be presented in sections. Each section shall contain the name of the presidential preference candidate, or the names of the candidates for delegates comprising the group, and, if applicable, that they have expressed a preference for a named person as candidate for presidential nominee of the party. Each section shall bear the name of the county in which it is circulated. Only voters of the county registered as affiliated with the Peace and Freedom Party are competent to sign.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6784.

Each section shall be prepared with the lines, for signatures numbered, and shall have attached the declaration of the circulator who obtained signatures to it, which shall meet all of the requirements of Section 104. No other declaration is required to be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 278, Sec. 10.   (SB 213)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6785.

A verified nomination paper is prima facie evidence that the signatures are genuine and that the persons signing it are voters registered as affiliated with the Peace and Freedom Party until it is otherwise proven by comparison of the signatures with the affidavits of registration in the office of the elections official.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6786.

The nomination paper for a candidate for the presidential preference portion of the ballot shall be in substantially the following form:SECTION OF NOMINATION PAPER SIGNED BY VOTER 
 ON BEHALF OF PRESIDENTIAL PREFERENCE 
 PRIMARY CANDIDATE Section ______Page ______
 County of _________.Nomination paper of a presidential preference candidate for the Peace and Freedom Party presidential primary ballot.State of CaliforniaCounty of ⎱
 ⎰ss.SIGNER’S STATEMENTI, the undersigned, am a voter of the County of ______, State of California, and am registered as affiliated with the Peace and Freedom Party. I hereby nominate ________ for the presidential preference portion of the Peace and Freedom Party’s presidential primary ballot, to be voted for at the presidential primary to be held on the ______ day of June, 20__. I have not signed the nomination paper of any other candidate for the same office, or for any group of delegates to the national convention of the ______ Party, with which the Peace and Freedom Party of California is affiliated on the national level.NumberSignaturePrinted
nameResidence
street address
/city 1. 2. 3. etc. CIRCULATOR’S AFFIDAVITI, ______, affirm
 all of the following:1.That I am 18 years of age or older.2.That my residence address, including street and number, is
.
 [If no street or number exists, a designation of my residence adequate to readily ascertain its location is
.]

3.That I secured signatures in the County of ____ to the nomination paper of a candidate in the presidential preference primary of the Peace and Freedom Party, that all the
 signatures on this section of the nomination paper numbered from 1 to ____, inclusive, were made in my presence, that the signatures were obtained between ____, 20_, and ____, 20_, and that to the best of my knowledge and belief each signature is the genuine signature of the person whose name it purports to be. 
I declare under penalty of perjury that the foregoing is true and correct.

Executed at ____, California, this ____ day of ____, 20_.
 (Signed) Circulator(Printed name)

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 278, Sec. 11.   (SB 213)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6787.

The nomination paper for a group of candidates for delegates to the national convention shall be in substantially the following form:SECTION OF NOMINATION PAPER SIGNED BY VOTER ON 
BEHALF OF GROUP OF CANDIDATES FOR DELEGATES 
TO NATIONAL CONVENTION Section ______Page ______
 County of _________.Nomination paper of group of candidates for election as delegates by the Peace and Freedom Party pledged to the candidacy of ______ as presidential nominee, or expressing no preference, as the case may be.State of CaliforniaCounty of ⎱
 ⎰ss.SIGNER’S
 STATEMENTI, the undersigned, am a voter of the County of ______, State of California, and am registered as affiliated with the Peace and Freedom Party. I hereby nominate the following:NumberNamesResidence
city or 
townCounty 1. 2. 3. etc. (to the number as may be required) as candidates for delegate to the national convention of the ______ Party, with which the Peace and Freedom Party of California is affiliated on the national level, to be voted for at the presidential primary to be held on the ______ day of June, 20___. I have not signed the nomination paper of any other group of candidates for delegates to the national convention or of any candidate for the presidential preference portion of the primary ballot.NumberSignaturePrinted
nameResidence
street address
/city 1. 2. 3. etc. CIRCULATOR’S AFFIDAVITI, ______, affirm all of the following:1.That I am 18 years of age or older.2.That my residence address, including street and number, is
.
 [If no street or number exists, a designation of my residence adequate to readily ascertain its location is
.]

3.That I secured signatures in the County of ____ to the nomination paper
 of the group of candidates named in the signer’s statement above as candidates for nomination and election by the Peace and Freedom Party as delegates to represent the Peace and Freedom Party of California in the ____ Party’s next national convention, that all the signatures on this section of the nomination paper numbered from 1 to ____, inclusive, were made in my presence, that the signatures were obtained between ____, 20__, and ____, 20__, and that to the best of my knowledge and belief each signature is the genuine signature of the person whose name it purports to be.
I declare under penalty of perjury that the foregoing is true and correct.

Executed at ____, California, this ____ day of ____, 20__.
 (Signed) Circulator(Printed name)

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 278, Sec. 12.   (SB 213)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6791.

Circulators may obtain signatures to the nomination paper of the candidate or group of candidates at any time not more than 120 nor less than 81 days prior to the presidential primary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 149, Sec. 17.   (SB 505)   Effective July 30, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6792.

Each section of a nomination paper, after being verified, shall be returned by the verification deputy who circulated it to the candidate, committee, or duly authorized representatives. All the sections circulated in any county shall be collected by the candidate, committee, or duly authorized representatives, who shall arrange and leave the sections with the elections official for examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 790, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6793.

Prior to filing, the sections of a nomination paper for any candidate or group of candidates shall be numbered in order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6794.

Nomination papers, properly assembled, may be consolidated and fastened together by counties, but nomination papers signed by voters in different counties shall not be fastened together.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6795.

The elections official shall examine all nomination papers left with her or him for examination and shall disregard and mark “not sufficient” the name of any voter of that county that does not appear in the same handwriting on an affidavit of registration in the office of the elections official. The elections official shall also disregard and mark “not sufficient” the name of any voter of the county who is not registered as affiliated with the Peace and Freedom Party.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6796.

Within five days after any nomination papers are left with the elections official for examination, the elections official shall:

(a) Examine and affix to them a certificate reciting that she or he has examined them and stating the number of names that have not been marked “not sufficient.”

(b) Transmit the papers with the certificate of examination to the Secretary of State, who shall file the papers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6797.

The certificate of the elections official to nomination papers of a candidate or group of candidates shall be in substantially the following form: CERTIFICATE OF COUNTY ELECTIONS OFFICIAL TO NOMINATION
PAPERS OF CANDIDATE OR GROUP OF CANDIDATESTo the Secretary of State:I, County Elections Official of the County of ______, hereby certify that I have examined the nomination papers, to which this certificate is attached, of the presidential candidate or group of candidates for delegates at the ensuing presidential primary, and that the number of names which I have not marked “not sufficient” is _______.
The candidate or group of candidates named in the nomination papers comprise the following (state names of candidates):etc.etc.etc.Dated this ________ day of ________, 20___.________________________(SEAL)County Elections OfficialBy
 Deputy

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 790, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6798.

(a) Upon receipt of a sufficient number of signatures for the nomination of a candidate for the presidential preference primary ballot, the Secretary of State shall notify the candidate or his or her duly authorized representative of that fact.

(b) Upon receipt of a sufficient number of signatures for the nomination of a group of candidates for delegates, the Secretary of State shall notify the chairperson of the committee of that fact.

(c) In each case, the Secretary of State shall advise the person receiving the notification that no more signatures will be received.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Peace and Freedom Party Presidential Primary Ballot [6820. - 6822.]

6820.

Upon the filing of nomination papers, the presidential preference primary candidate or slate of delegate candidates shall be voted upon, but the names of candidates for delegates to the national convention shall not be printed upon the ballot.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6821.

For the presidential primary election, the format of the Peace and Freedom Party ballot shall be governed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 13100) of Division 13, with the following exceptions:

(a) In place of the heading “Delegates to National Convention, vote for one group only” shall appear the heading “Presidential Preference, vote for one.”

(b) Selected and unselected presidential candidates shall be listed below the heading specified in subdivision (a).

(c) Below the presidential candidates shall appear in the same column, or in the
 next column if there is not sufficient space in the first column, the heading “Delegates to National Convention, vote for one group.”

(d) Presidential candidates who have qualified for the ballot and to whom delegations are pledged, and the chairpersons of unpledged delegations which have qualified for the ballot, shall be listed below the heading specified in subdivision (c).

(e) The instructions to voters shall be the same as provided for in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 13100) of Division 13, except that they shall begin with the words, “To express your preference for a candidate for nomination for President, completely fill in the [voting target] next to the candidate’s name. Your vote in this portion of the ballot is advisory only. Delegates to the national convention
 will be elected in the delegate selection portion of the ballot.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 8.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6822.

Any person who believes his or her name may be used as a write-in candidate for President of the United States shall, not later than 21 days before the primary election, file an endorsement of his or her write-in candidacy with the Secretary of State, or no votes shall be counted for that write-in candidate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Certification of National Convention Delegates Elected and Postelection Proceedings [6840. - 6849.]

6840.

The number of delegates to be certified as elected from each group of delegate candidates shall be the whole number nearest the product obtained by multiplying the total number of delegates to be elected by the ratio which that group’s vote bears to the total of votes cast for all those groups of delegates, with the following to apply in order to adjust the total number of delegates certified to the total number to which the state is entitled:

(a) If this procedure would result in a total number of
 delegates being elected greater than the number to which the state is entitled, the calculation outlined above shall be repeated using a total vote cast for all groups of delegates that is sufficiently larger than the actual total vote so as to give a total number of delegates elected equal to the number to which the state is entitled.

(b) If this procedure would result in a total number of delegates being elected smaller than the number to which the state is entitled, the calculation outlined above shall be repeated using a total vote cast for all groups of delegates that is sufficiently smaller than the actual total vote so as to give a total number of delegates elected equal to the number to which the state is entitled.

(c) If a tie renders unworkable the procedure for adjusting to the proper delegate total outlined in subdivisions (a) and (b), those delegate candidates so tied
 shall be certified as elected with a fractional vote proportional to their group’s total vote so that the total number of delegates certified, including the fractional-vote delegates, equals the number to which the state is entitled.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6841.

The Secretary of State shall send, not more than three business days after the presidential primary, to the chairperson of each committee qualifying a group of candidates for national convention delegates for the Peace and Freedom Party presidential primary ballot a copy of the semiofficial canvass of the vote for each of the group of delegates showing the vote for each group in each county, the total statewide vote for each group, and the tentative number of delegates which each group will be entitled to have declared elected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6842.

Each group of candidates for delegate shall meet or confer after the presidential primary and by majority vote shall determine the order in which members of the group shall be certified as elected by the Secretary of State. The order so determined shall commence with a resident of either the northern or the southern territories, and the names thereafter shall alternate between residents of the northern and southern territories until the alternation is no longer possible. The order so determined shall be certified to the Secretary of State by the chairperson of
 the committee forming the group not later than the 28th day after the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 55, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6843.

The Secretary of State shall, not later than the 32nd day after the election, file in her or his office a statement of the canvassed returns for the Peace and Freedom Party presidential preferential primary and the national convention delegate selection election, compiled from the returns filed with the Secretary of State by the county elections officials. The compiled statement shall show, for each candidate or group, the total of the votes received, the votes received in each county, and, in the case of a group, the names of the candidates comprising that
 group.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 55, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6844.

The Secretary of State shall, not later than the 32nd day after the election, issue a certificate of election to as many persons in each group as are entitled to be declared elected from that group pursuant to Section 6840. The names certified from each group shall be certified in the order in which they were specified by the group pursuant to Section 6842. If no order was specified, the Secretary of State shall certify as many persons from the group as are entitled to be elected from the order in which the names of the candidates appeared on the nomination paper
 of the group, with the additional requirement that an equal number of names be selected of persons residing in the northern and the southern territories, or, if the number to be selected is odd, that one more person residing in the territory with the greater portion of the state’s registered Peace and Freedom Party voters shall be certified than the number of persons certified residing in the other territory. Certification of any delegates to which a write-in candidate is entitled shall be made within three business days of the receipt of the names of those delegates pursuant to Sections 6846 and 6847.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 55, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6845.

Any person who receives, by write-in vote, a sufficient number of votes in the national convention delegate selection portion of the Peace and Freedom Party presidential primary to be entitled to one or more convention delegates pursuant to Section 6840, shall, within 37 days after the primary election, file a list of as many delegates as the person is entitled to with the Secretary of State. The delegates selected shall meet the residence distribution requirement specified in Section 6763 and shall be voters registered as affiliated with the Peace and Freedom
 Party in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 55, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6846.

If a write-in candidate fails to file the list of delegates pursuant to Section 6845, the state central committee of the party shall, within 10 days of the end of the 31-day period specified in Section 6845, file a list of those delegates with the Secretary of State. Any delegates so certified by the state central committee shall attend the convention unpledged to any candidate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6847.

The elected delegates may, if they desire, meet or confer prior to attending the convention to select a chairperson of the delegation and to fill any vacancies in the office of delegate or alternate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6848.

The alternate of any delegate who is unable to attend the convention shall attend the convention in the place of the delegate and shall otherwise discharge the duties of that delegate. An alternate shall not vote in the place of the delegate whom the alternate represents when the delegate is occupying her or his seat at the convention.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6849.

The Secretary of State shall, as soon as practicable, certify to the chairperson of the state central committee and to the chairperson of each party county central committee of record, the final list of national convention delegates.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Green Party Presidential Primary [6850. - 6864.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [6850. - 6850.7.]

6850.

This chapter applies to the presidential preference primary ballot of the Green Party only. As used in this chapter, “Green Party” means the Green Party of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 95.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6850.5.

The Green Party presidential preference primary ballot shall express the presidential preference of California voters who vote in the Green Party presidential preference primary election. National convention delegates shall be selected as provided for in the bylaws and the rules and procedures of the Green Party and pursuant to the rules of the national political party with which the Green Party is affiliated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 96.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6850.7.

A filing fee shall not be required from a person to be voted for in a Green Party presidential primary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 2.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Qualification of Candidates for Presidential Preference Primary Ballot [6851. - 6853.5.]

6851.

The Secretary of State shall place the name of a candidate upon the Green Party presidential preference primary ballot when the Secretary of State has determined that the candidate is generally advocated for or recognized throughout the United States or California as actively seeking the presidential nomination of the Green Party or the national political party with which the Green Party is affiliated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 98.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6851.5.

On or before the 120th day preceding a presidential primary election, the Secretary of State shall send a letter by first-class mail to the Green Party Liaison to the Secretary of State informing the Green Party Liaison that, while a response is not required, any information the Green Party Liaison wishes to submit will be considered by the Secretary of State in the determination of candidates to be placed on the Green Party presidential preference primary ballot pursuant to Section 6851.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 149, Sec. 18.   (SB 505)   Effective July 30, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6852.

On or before the 88th day preceding a presidential primary election, the Secretary of State shall publicly announce and distribute to the news media for publication a list of the candidates the Secretary of State intends to place on the ballot at the following presidential primary election. Following this announcement, the Secretary of State may add candidates to the Secretary of State’s selection, but the Secretary of State may not delete any candidate whose name appears on the announced list. The Secretary of State shall mail a copy of the list and any subsequent additions to the list to the Green Party Liaison to the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 149, Sec. 19.   (SB 505)   Effective July 30, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6852.5.

When the Secretary of State decides to place the name of a candidate on the ballot pursuant to Sections 6851 and 6852, the Secretary of State shall notify the candidate that her or his name will appear on the Green Party presidential preference primary ballot.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 2.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6853.

If a selected candidate or an unselected candidate files with the Secretary of State, no later than the 68th day before the presidential primary election, an affidavit stating without qualification that she or he is not a candidate for the office of President of the United States at the forthcoming presidential primary election, the name of that candidate shall be omitted from the list of names certified by the Secretary of State to the elections official for the ballot and the name of that candidate shall not appear on the presidential preference primary ballot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 99.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6853.5.

An unselected candidate desiring to have her or his name placed on the presidential preference primary ballot shall have nomination papers circulated on her or his behalf. In order to qualify the name of that candidate for placement on the presidential preference primary ballot, the nomination papers of the candidate shall be signed by voters registered as preferring the Green Party equal in number to not less than 1 percent of the number of persons registered as preferring the Green Party as reflected in the report of registration issued by the Secretary of State on the 135th day before the presidential primary election.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 2.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Preparation, Circulation, and Filing of Nominating Papers [6854. - 6860.]

6854.

This article applies to the nomination of a Green Party candidate for the presidential preference primary ballot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 100.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6854.5.

Nomination papers properly prepared, circulated, signed, and verified shall be left, for examination, with the elections official of the county in which they are circulated at least 81 days before the presidential preference primary election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 149, Sec. 20.   (SB 505)   Effective July 30, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6855.

Each signer of a nomination paper for the presidential preference primary ballot may sign only one paper. The signer shall add her or his printed name and place of residence indicating city and giving the street and number, if any.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 102.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6855.5.

A nomination paper may be presented in sections. Each section shall contain the name of the presidential preference candidate. Each section shall bear the name of the county in which it is circulated. Only voters of the county registered as preferring the Green Party are competent to sign.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 2.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6856.

Each section shall be prepared with the lines for signatures numbered, and shall have attached the declaration of the circulator who obtained signatures to it, which shall meet all of the requirements of Section 104. No other declaration is required to be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 2.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6856.5.

A verified nomination paper is prima facie evidence that the signatures are genuine and that the persons signing it are voters registered as preferring the Green Party until it is otherwise proven by comparison of the signatures with the affidavits of registration in the office of the elections official.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 726, Sec. 2.   (AB 477)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6857.

The nomination paper for a candidate for the presidential preference primary ballot shall be in substantially the following form:SECTION OF NOMINATION PAPER SIGNED BY VOTER ON 
BEHALF OF PRESIDENTIAL PREFERENCE PRIMARY CANDIDATESection ____________Page ____________County of __________.Nomination paper of a presidential preference candidate for the Green Party presidential preference primary ballot.State of CaliforniaCounty of ⎱
 ⎰ss.SIGNER’S STATEMENTI, the undersigned, am a voter of the County of ____________, State of California, and am registered as preferring the Green Party. I hereby nominate ____________ for the presidential preference portion of the Green Party’s presidential primary ballot, to be voted for at the presidential preference primary to be held on the____________ day of ____________, 20____. I have
 not signed the nomination paper of any other candidate for the same office.Number_________Signature_________Printed name_________Residence 1. 2. 3. etc.CIRCULATOR’S DECLARATIONI, ________, affirm all of the following:1.That I am 18 years of age or older.2.That my residence address, including street number, is
.
 [If no street or number exists, a designation of my residence adequate to readily ascertain its location is
.]

3.That I secured signatures in the County of ________ to the nomination paper of a candidate in the presidential preference primary
 of the Green Party, that all the signatures on this section of the nomination paper numbered from 1 to ______, inclusive, were made in my presence, that the signatures were obtained between ____________, 20__, and ____________, 20__, and that to the best of my knowledge and belief each signature is the genuine signature of the person whose name it purports to be.I declare under penalty of perjury that the foregoing is true and correct.Executed at ________, California, this ____ day of ____, 20__.[Signed] ______________________________Circulator[Printed Name] _____________________________

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 103.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6857.2.
